Hawaii, session 2026, HB2215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that delays, inconsistencies, and lack of transparency in state and county building permitting processes increase the cost of housing, infrastructure, and economic development projects across the State.  While each county administers its own permitting systems, the absence of standardized data reporting and statewide visibility into permitting timelines and bottlenecks limits the State's ability to identify systemic challenges, deploy technical assistance, and improve regulatory efficiency. The legislature further finds that the state building code council plays a central role in establishing statewide building standards, coordinating with counties, and advancing code modernization efforts.  However, the council currently lacks dedicated staffing capacity to support ongoing data collection, analysis, training coordination, and transparency initiatives related to permitting performance. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen the capacity of the state building code council by: (1)  Establishing a permanent full-time position to support statewide building code coordination, permitting transparency and modernization initiative; (2)  Requiring consistent county reporting on building permitting performance; (3)  Developing a standardized statewide permitting data system or public dashboard; and (4)  Improving consistency and professionalism in permitting administration through standardized credentialing and training requirements. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the state building code council one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent position to support statewide building code coordination, permitting transparency, and modernization initiatives. (b) The duties of the position shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Coordinating the collection, analysis, and publication of county permitting data; (2)  Supporting the development and maintenance of a standardized statewide permitting data system or public dashboard; (3)  Advancing state building code modernization and transparency initiatives in coordination with relevant county and state agencies; and (4)  Developing and supporting standardized credentialing and training requirements for permitting officials in coordination with county agencies. SECTION 3. (a)  Each county shall submit to the state building code council, in a form and manner prescribed by the council, periodic reports on building permitting performance, including but not limited to: (1)  Average and median permitting timelines by permit type; (2)  Permit volumes and backlogs; (3)  Identified permitting bottlenecks or capacity constraints; and (4)  Other metrics determined by the council to support transparency and performance evaluation. (b) The state building code council shall compile and publish the information obtained as required by subsection (a) through a standardized statewide permitting data system or publicly accessible dashboard. SECTION 4. (a)  The state building code council shall establish or designate a standardized statewide permitting data system or public dashboard to improve transparency, accountability, and coordination across counties. (b) The system or dashboard shall, to the extent practicable: (1)  Provide consistent, comparable permitting performance metrics across counties; (2)  Allow for identification of systemic bottlenecks and best practices; and (3)  Support data-driven improvements to permitting processes and building code administration. SECTION 5. (a)  The state building code council shall develop recommended statewide standards for credentialing, training, and continuing education for permitting officials, in consultation with county agencies and other relevant stakeholders. (b) The standards shall be advisory in nature unless otherwise provided by law and shall be intended to promote consistency, professionalism, and efficiency in permitting administration statewide. SECTION 6. (a)  The state building code council shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. (b) The report shall include the following: (1)  Implementation status of the permanent position; (2)  County compliance with permitting data reporting; (3)  Progress on the statewide permitting data system or dashboard; and (4)  Recommendations for further statutory or administrative action. SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent position as established by section 2 of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state building code council for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________